Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.050

Review committee—Composition—Submission of plan or amendment to.

Prior to the adoption of or amendment of the sewerage and/or water general plan, the county legislative authority (or authorities) shall submit the plan or amendment to a review committee. The review committee shall consist of:

(1) A representative of each city with a population of ten thousand or more within or adjoining the area selected by the mayor thereof (if there are no such cities within the plan area, then one representative chosen by the mayor of the city with the largest population within the plan area);

(2) One representative chosen at large by a majority vote of the executive officers of the other cities or towns within or adjoining the area;

(3) A representative chosen by the executive officer or the chair of the board, as the case may be, of each of the other municipal corporations and private utilities serving one thousand or more sewer and/or water customers located within the area;

(4) One representative chosen at large by a majority vote of the executive officers and chairs of the boards, as the case may be, of the other remaining municipal corporations within the area;

(5) A representative of each county legislative authority within the planned area, selected by the chair of each board or county executive, as the case may be; and

(6) In counties where there is a metropolitan municipal corporation operating a sewerage and/or water system in the area, the chair of its council or such person as the chair designates.

If the legislative authority rejects the plan pursuant to RCW 36.94.090, the review committee shall be deemed to be dissolved; otherwise the review committee shall continue in existence to review amendments to the plan. Vacancies on the committee shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment to that position.

Instead of a review committee for each plan area, the county legislative authority or authorities may create a review committee for the entire county or counties, and the review committee shall continue in existence until dissolved by the county legislative authority or authorities.

[ 1994 c 81 s 74; 1981 c 313 s 16; 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 2; 1967 c 72 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 313: See note following RCW 36.94.020.

Construction—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 96: See notes following RCW 36.94.010.